Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-222
Water Sustainability Fund; created; use; investment.

The Water Sustainability Fund is created in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. The fund shall be used in accordance with the provisions established in sections 2-1506 to 2-1513 and for costs directly related to the administration of the fund. The Legislature shall not appropriate or transfer money from the Water Sustainability Fund for any other purpose, except that transfers may be made from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund and as a one-time transfer to the General Fund as described in this section.

The Water Sustainability Fund shall consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature, other funds as appropriated by the Legislature, and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of the United States may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such department or agency. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Prior to October 1, 2024, investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

It is the intent of the Legislature that twenty-one million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund in fiscal year 2014-15 and that eleven million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund each fiscal year beginning in fiscal year 2015-16.

The Department of Administrative Services shall establish a subaccount within the Water Sustainability Fund for the accounting of any money transferred to the fund from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund. Any money transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund shall be expended in accordance with section 81-15,168.

Laws 2014, LB906, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB661, § 31;

Laws 2020, LB1009, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB384, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB507, § 6;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 23;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 143;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 341.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.